Florida, session 2026, HB671.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (9) of section 1001.212, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1001.212 Office of Safe Schools.—There is created in the
Department of Education the Office of Safe Schools. The office
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb671-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 671 2026
is fully accountable to the Commissioner of Education. The
office shall serve as a central repository for best practices,
training standards, and compliance oversight in all matters
regarding school safety and security, including prevention
efforts, intervention efforts, and emergency preparedness
planning. The office shall:
(9) Award grants to schools to improve the safety and
security of schools school buildings based upon recommendations
of the security risk assessment developed pursuant to subsection
(1) or as provided in s. 1002.42(21).
Section 2. Subsection (21) is added to section 1002.42,
Florida Statutes, to read:
1002.42 Private schools.—
(21) SCHOOL SAFETY EQUIPMENT REQUIREMENTS.—
(a) For purposes of this subsection, the term:
1. "Ballistic shield" means a mobile protective device
meeting the National Institute of Justice's Level IIIA ballistic
resistance standards or higher.
2. "Breaching tool" means a device designed to provide
rapid access to locked or barricaded doors in an emergency,
including, but not limited to, a Halligan bar, sledge hammer, or
hydraulic breaching tool approved by a local law enforcement
agency.
3. "Campus" means the grounds and facilities of a private
school where students are regularly educated.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb671-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 671 2026
(b) Each private school must have at least one breaching
tool and one ballistic shield on each campus of the school for
use in the event of an active assailant or other life-
threatening incident. The Department of Education, in
consultation with the Department of Law Enforcement, shall
establish minimum specifications for breaching tools and
ballistic shields.
(c) Each private school may use existing grants from the
School Hardening Grant Program as funded by the Legislature or
may use other available state or private funds to meet the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Each private school must ensure that at least one
school employee or the school's safe-school officer receives
annual training on the deployment and safe use of the equipment
required under this subsection. The training must be conducted
in coordination with the sheriff's office or a local law
enforcement agency having jurisdiction.
(e) Each private school must annually report to the Office
of Safe Schools, in a format prescribed by the office, that the
equipment required under this section is present, functional,
and accessible. The office may conduct random audits to verify
compliance with this subsection.
Section 3. Paragraph (i) is added to subsection (6) of
section 1006.07, Florida Statutes, to read:
1006.07 District school board duties relating to student
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb671-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 671 2026
discipline and school safety.—The district school board shall
provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the
attendance and control of students at school, and for proper
attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the
welfare of students, including:
(6) SAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.—Each district
school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures
for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the
assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior
poses a threat to the safety of the school community.
(i) School safety equipment requirements.—
1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
a. "Ballistic shield" means a mobile protective device
meeting the National Institute of Justice's Level IIIA ballistic
resistance standards or higher.
b. "Breaching tool" means a device designed to provide
rapid access to locked or barricaded doors in an emergency,
including, but not limited to, a Halligan bar, sledge hammer, or
hydraulic breaching tool approved by a local law enforcement
agency.
c. "Campus" means the grounds and facilities of a public
school, including charter schools, where students are regularly
educated.
2. Each public school, including charter schools, must
100 have at least one breaching tool and one ballistic shield on
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb671-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 671 2026
101 each campus of the school for use in the event of an active
102 assailant or other life-threatening incident. The Department of
103 Education, in consultation with the Department of Law
104 Enforcement, shall establish minimum specifications for
105 breaching tools and ballistic shields.
106 3. Each school may use existing grants from the School
107 Hardening Grant Program as funded by the Legislature or may use
108 other state or private funds to meet the requirements of this
109 paragraph.
110 4. Each school must ensure that at least one school
111 employee or the school's safe-school officer receives annual
112 training on the deployment and safe use of the equipment
113 required under this paragraph. The training must be conducted in
114 coordination with the sheriff's office or a local law
115 enforcement agency having jurisdiction.
116 5. Each school must annually report to the Office of Safe
117 Schools, in a format prescribed by the office, that the
118 equipment required under this section is present, functional,
119 and accessible. The office may conduct random audits to verify
120 compliance with this paragraph.
121 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb671-00